Louisiana, session 2026, HB775.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1079.1 and 1165.1(B)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§1079.1. Medical treatment; exceptions; record requests
A.(1) Consent to the provision of medical or surgical care or services by a
hospital or public clinic, or to the performance of medical or surgical care or services
by a physician, licensed to practice medicine in this state, when executed by a minor
who is or believes himself to be afflicted with an illness or disease, shall be valid and
binding as if the minor had achieved his majority. Any such consent shall not be
subject to a later disaffirmance by reason of his minority. Except as otherwise
provided for in Subsection B of this Section, no healthcare provider shall provide
medical or surgical care or services to any person who has not attained the age of
majority without the consent of the parent, legal guardian, or any person professing
to be serving as temporary custodian or caregiver of the person who has not attained
the age of majority at the request of a parent or legal guardian.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 775 ENROLLED
(2) A minor may consent to medical care or the administration of medication
by a hospital licensed to provide hospital services or by a physician licensed to
practice medicine in this state for the purpose of alleviating or reducing pain,
discomfort, or distress of and during labor and childbirth. The manner of
administration of medications includes but is not limited to intravenous,
intramuscular, epidural, and spinal. This consent shall be valid and binding as if the
minor had achieved her majority, and it shall not be subject to a later disaffirmance
by reason of her minority.
(1) A healthcare provider, healthcare facility, hospital, physician, nurse,
emergency medical services provider, or other person licensed or authorized to
provide healthcare services in this state may rely in good faith on the representation
of a person professing to be serving as temporary custodian or caregiver of a person
who has not attained the age of majority.
(2) The provisions of R.S. 40:1159.4(F) and (G) shall apply to any hospital,
healthcare facility, physician, or healthcare provider that relies in good faith on any
direction or decision by any person reasonably believed to be authorized and
empowered to consent under this Section.
(3) A healthcare provider or healthcare facility relying on the representations
of a temporary custodian or caregiver under this Section shall have no affirmative
duty to investigate, verify, or confirm the legal authority of the person professing to
be serving as temporary custodian or caregiver of such person who has not attained
the age of majority at the request of a parent or legal guardian absent actual
knowledge that the representation is false.
B.(1) The consent of a spouse, parent, guardian, or any other person standing
in a fiduciary capacity to the minor shall not be necessary in order to authorize such
hospital care or services or medical or surgical care or services, or administration of
drugs to be provided by a physician licensed to practice medicine to such a minor.
A person who has not attained the age of majority may consent to the provision of
medical and mental health services in any of the following circumstances:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 775 ENROLLED
(a) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is a member of the
armed forces of the United States of America.
(b) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is emancipated.
(c) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is pregnant and
consenting to medical or surgical care or services related to the pregnancy.
(d) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is seeking
treatment for alcohol or substance misuse.
(e) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is seeking medical
or surgical care and services for the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases.
(f) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is donating blood.
(g) If a healthcare provider, in his professional judgment, believes the person
who has not attained the age of majority is exhibiting signs of abuse or neglect as
defined in Children's Code Article 603.
(h) If a person who has not attained the age of majority voluntarily chooses
to be admitted to a treatment facility in accordance with Children's Code Article
1464.
(i) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is enrolled as a
student in a college or university, not including a high school student that is dually
enrolled in a post-secondary education program.
(j) If the person who has not attained the age of majority is seeking
contraceptives or prevention or treatment for a sexually transmitted infection, with
the exception of the provision of a vaccination for a sexual transmitted disease or
infection.
(2) Consent given by a person who has not attained the age of majority in
accordance with this Subsection shall be valid and binding as if the person had
achieved his majority. Any such consent shall not be subject to a later disaffirmance
by reason of his minority.
C. Upon the advice and direction of a treating physician, or, in the case of
a medical staff, any one of them, a physician or member of a medical staff may, but
shall not be obligated to, inform the spouse, parent or guardian of any such minor as
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 775 ENROLLED
to the treatment given or needed, and such information may be given to, or withheld
from the spouse, parent or guardian without the consent and over the express
objection of the minor. Consent to surgical or medical treatment for a person who
has not reached the age of eighteen shall be implied in cases of emergency, as
defined in R.S. 40:1159.5.
D. No licensed healthcare facility hospital and no physician licensed
healthcare provider authorized to practice medicine provide healthcare services in
this state shall incur civil or criminal liability in connection with any examination,
diagnosis and treatment authorized by this Section except for negligence.
* * *
§1165.1. Healthcare information; records
* * *
B. As used in this Section:
* * *
(2) "Patient" means a natural person who receives or should have received
health care from a licensed health care provider, under a contract, express or implied
or, in the case of a person under the age of eighteen, the parent, tutor, or legal
guardian of a person who has not attained the age of majority.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1079.2, 1079.3, and 1079.13 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.